California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) For the one-year period immediately prior to commencement of the transfer and continuing until the transfer is completed, 85 percent or more of the company’s income consists of amounts collected from stockholders for the sole purpose of meeting
 losses and expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1108, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24481.

Section 383 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special limitations on certain excess credits, etc., is modified to apply to credits allowable under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 23601), and the minimum tax credit allowable under Section 23453.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 82.   Effective July 16, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Deferred Compensation, Etc. [24601. - 24612.]



  ARTICLE 1. Adoption of Subchapter D of the Internal Revenue Code Relating to Deferred Compensation, etc. [24601. - 24602.]

24601.

(a) Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deferred compensation, etc., shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Notwithstanding the date specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 23051.5, Part I of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to pension, profitsharing, stock bonus plans, etc., and Part III of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rules relating to minimum funding standards and benefit limitations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided, without regard to taxable year to the same extent as
 applicable for federal income tax purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 109.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24602.

(a) In addition to the application of Part II (commencing with Section 421) of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain stock options, paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of Section 421(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall also apply to any California qualified stock option that is granted to an individual whose earned income from the corporation granting the California qualified stock option for the taxable year in which that option is exercised does not exceed forty thousand dollars
 ($40,000). In the event that the option does not meet the necessary qualifications, the option shall be treated as a nonqualified stock option.

(b) For purposes of this section, “California qualified stock option” means a stock option that is issued and exercised pursuant to this section and that is designated by the corporation issuing the option as a California qualified stock option at the time the option is granted.

(c) (1) This section shall apply only to those stock options that are issued on or after January 1, 1997, and before January 1, 2002, by a corporation to its employee and are exercised by the employee, while employed by the corporation that issued those stock options (or within three months thereof, or within one year thereof if permanently and totally disabled as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code), during the taxable
 year with respect to any class of shares, or combination thereof, issued by the corporation, to the extent that the number of shares transferable by the exercise of the options does not exceed a total of 1,000 and have a combined fair market value of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The combined fair market value of any stock shall be determined as of the time the option with respect to that stock is granted.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall be applied by taking options into account in the order in which they were granted.

(d) In the case of a California qualified stock option, no amount shall be included in the gross income of the employee until the time of the disposition of the option (or the stock acquired upon exercise of the option). No deduction shall be allowed under Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code to the employer on the grant or exercise of a California
 qualified stock option.

(e) Subdivision (d) shall not apply to any stock option for which an election has been made under Section 83(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election to include in gross income in year of transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 172.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exceptions to Part I of Subchapter D of the Internal Revenue Code, Relating to Pension, Profit-Sharing, Stock Bonus Plans, etc. [24611. - 24612.]

24611.

(a) Section 404(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to dividends paid deduction, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, Section 404(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain contributions to employee ownership plans, is modified to provide that Section 404(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to an “S corporation.”

(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January l, 1998, Section 404(k)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deduction for dividends on certain employer securities, is modified to provide that the phrase “a corporation” shall read “a C corporation.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 173.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24612.

Sections 413(b)(6) and 413(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to liability for funding tax, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 698, Sec. 22.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Accounting Periods and Methods of Accounting [24631. - 24726.]



  ARTICLE 1. Accounting Periods [24631. - 24637.]

24631.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2000, income shall be computed on the basis of the taxpayer’s income year.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000 (other than the first taxable year beginning on or after that date), income shall be
 computed on the basis of the taxpayer’s taxable year.

(3) As provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 23151, paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 23181, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23183, for the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, income shall be computed on the basis of both the preceding income year and the current taxable year.

(b) For purposes of this part, the term “income year” or “taxable year” (as applicable) means—

(1) The taxpayer’s annual accounting period, if it is a calendar year or a fiscal year;

(2) The calendar year, if subsection (g) applies; or

(3) The period for which the return is made, if a return is made
 for a period of less than 12 months.

(c) For purposes of this part, the term “annual accounting period” means the annual period on the basis of which the taxpayer regularly computes its income in keeping its books.

(d) For purposes of this part, the term “calendar year” means a period of 12 months ending on December 31st.

(e) For purposes of this part, the term “fiscal year” means a period of 12 months ending on the last day of any month other than December. In the case of any taxpayer who has made the election provided by subsection (f), the term means the annual period (varying from 52 to 53 weeks) so elected.

(f) (1) A taxpayer who, in keeping its books, regularly computes its income on the basis of an annual period which varies
 from 52 to 53 weeks and ends always on the same day of the week and ends always—(A) On whatever date such same day of the week last occurs in a calendar month, or(B) On whatever date such same day of the week falls which is nearest to the last day of a calendar month,may (in accordance with the regulations prescribed under paragraph (3)) elect to compute its income for purposes of this part on the basis of such annual period. This paragraph shall apply to taxable years ending after December 31, 1954.

(2) (A) In any case in which the effective date or the applicability of any provision of this part is expressed in terms of taxable years beginning or
 ending with reference to a specified date which is the first or last day of a month, a taxable year described in paragraph (1) shall be treated—

(i) As beginning with the first day of the calendar month beginning nearest to the first day of such taxable year, or

(ii) As ending with the last day of the calendar month ending nearest to the last day of such taxable year, as the case may be.

(B) In the case of a change from or to a taxable year described in paragraph (1)—

(i) If such change results in a short period (within the meaning of Section 24634) of 359 days or more, or less than seven days, Section 24636 shall not apply;

(ii) If such change results in a short period of less than seven
 days, such short period shall, for purposes of this part, be added to and deemed a part of the following taxable year; and

(iii) If such change results in a short period to which Section 24634 applies, the income for such short period shall be placed on an annual basis for purposes of such subsection by multiplying such income by 365 and dividing the result by the number of days in a short period, and the tax shall be the same part of the tax computed on the annual basis as the number of days in the short period is of 365 days.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe such regulations as it deems necessary for the application of this subsection.

(g) Except as provided in Section 24634 (relating to returns for periods of less than 12 months), the taxpayer’s taxable year shall be the calendar year if—

(1) The taxpayer keeps no books;

(2) The taxpayer does not have an annual accounting period; or

(3) The taxpayer has an annual accounting period, but such period does not qualify as a fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24632.

The taxable year of a taxpayer may not be different than the taxable year used for purposes of the Internal Revenue Code, unless initiated or approved by the Franchise Tax Board, or otherwise required under Section 24634.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24633.

If a taxpayer changes its annual accounting period, the new accounting period shall become the taxpayer’s taxable year only if the change is approved by the Franchise Tax Board. For purposes of this part, if a taxpayer to whom Section 24631(g) applies adopts an annual accounting period (as defined in Section 24631(c)) other than a calendar year, the taxpayer shall be treated as having changed its annual accounting period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 176.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24633.5.

(a) In the case of any “S corporation” or personal service corporation required to change its accounting period by the federal Tax Reform Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-514) as modified by Section 10206 of Public Law 100-203 and Section 1008(e) of Public Law 100-647, that change shall be treated as initiated by the “S corporation” or personal service corporation with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) With respect to any beneficiary, partner, or shareholder which
 is required to include the items from more than one taxable year of the trust, partnership, or corporation in any one taxable year, any income in excess of expenses for the short taxable year resulting from the change described in subdivision (a) or subdivision (a) of Section 17551.5 shall be taken into account ratably in each of the first four taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986, unless the beneficiary, partner, or shareholder elects to include all that income in the beneficiary’s, partner’s, or shareholder’s taxable year with or within which the trust’s, partnership’s, or corporation’s short taxable year ends.

(c) The spreading of income over four years, as allowed by subdivision (b), shall not apply unless the taxpayer receives similar treatment for federal income tax purposes.

(d) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, each of the following shall
 apply:

(1) The adjusted basis of any partner’s interest in a partnership or shareholder’s stock in an “S corporation” shall be determined as if all of the income to be taken into account ratably in the four taxable years referred to in subdivision (b) were included in gross income for the first of those taxable years.

(2) If any interest in a partnership or stock in an “S corporation” is disposed of before the last taxable year in the spread period, all amounts which would be included in the gross income of the partner or shareholder for subsequent taxable years in the spread period under subdivision (b) and attributable to the interest or stock disposed of shall be included in gross income for the taxable year in which the disposition occurs. For purposes of the preceding sentence, the term “spread period” means the period consisting of the four taxable years referred to in
 subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 177.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24634.

(a) A return for a period of less than 12 months (referred to in this article as “short period”) shall be made under any of the following circumstances:

(1) When the taxpayer, with the approval of the Franchise Tax Board, changes its annual accounting period. In such a case, the return shall be made for the short period beginning on the day after the close of the former taxable year and ending at the close of the day before the day designated as the first day of the new
 taxable year.

(2) When the taxpayer is in existence during only part of what would otherwise be its taxable year, except if the taxpayer’s existence terminates as a result of a reorganization described in Section 368(a)(1)(F) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) When the Franchise Tax Board terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under Sections 19081 and 19082 (relating to tax in jeopardy).

(4) When the taxpayer is required to make a federal return for a period of less than 12 months.

(b) This section shall apply whether or not a federal return is required to be filed for a period of less than 12 months. 

(c) If a return is required to be filed under this section for a period of less than 12
 months, that period shall be deemed to be a taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 178.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24636.

(a) If a separate return is made by a taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 2, under Section 24634 on account of a change in the accounting period the net income, computed on the basis of the period for which the separate return is made, referred to in this section as “the short period,” shall be placed on an annual basis by multiplying the amount thereof by 12, and dividing by the number of months in the short period. The Franchise Tax Board shall compute the amount of a tax on the income placed on such annual basis, and
 shall allow the offset provided for in Article 3 of Chapter 2, from such tax. The tax due under this section, which shall not be subject of offset, shall be such part of the tax, less the offset allowed, computed on such annual basis as the number of months in the short period is of 12 months.

(b) If a taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 2 establishes the amount of its net income for the period of 12 months beginning with the first day of the short period, computed as if such 12-month period were a taxable year, under the law applicable to such year, then the tax for the short period shall be reduced to an amount which is such part of the tax computed on the net income for such 12-month period as the net income computed on the basis of the short period is of the net income for the 12-month period. The taxpayer (other than a taxpayer to which the next sentence applies) shall compute the tax and file its return without the application
 of this section. If the taxpayer has disposed of substantially all its assets prior to the end of such 12-month period, then in lieu of the net income for such 12-month period there shall be used for the purposes of this section the net income for the 12-month period ending with the last day of the short period. The tax computed under this section shall in no case be less than the tax computed on the net income for the short period without placing such net income on an annual basis. The benefits of this section shall not be allowed unless the taxpayer, at such time as regulations prescribed hereunder require (but not after the time prescribed for the filing of the return for the first taxable year which ends on or after 12 months after the beginning of the short period), makes application therefor in accordance with such regulations. Such application, in case the return was filed without regard to this section, shall be considered a claim for credit or refund with respect to the amount by which the tax is
 reduced under this section. The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe such regulations as it may deem necessary for the application of this section.

(c) In the case of a taxpayer required to file a short period return pursuant to Section 24634, the alternative minimum tax shall be determined in accordance with Section 443(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 179.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24637.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, Section 444 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of taxable year other than required taxable year, shall be applicable, except that Section 444(c)(1), relating to effect of election, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 180.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Methods of Accounting [24651. - 24654.]

24651.

(a) Income shall be computed under the method of accounting on the basis of which the taxpayer regularly computes its income in keeping its books.

(b) If no method of accounting has been regularly used by the taxpayer, or if the method used does not clearly reflect income, the computation of income shall be made under such method as, in the opinion of the Franchise Tax Board, does clearly reflect income.

(c) Subject to subdivisions (a) and (b) and Section 24654, a taxpayer
 may compute income under any of the following methods of accounting—

(1) The cash receipts and disbursements method;

(2) An accrual method;

(3) Any other method permitted by this part; or

(4) Any combination of the foregoing methods permitted under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) A taxpayer engaged in more than one trade or business may in computing income, use a different method of accounting for each trade or business.

(e) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, a taxpayer who changes the method of accounting on the basis of which it regularly computes its income in keeping its books
 shall, before computing its income under the new method, secure the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(f) If the taxpayer does not file with the Franchise Tax Board a request to change the method of accounting, the absence of the consent of the Franchise Tax Board to a change in the method of accounting shall not be taken into account for either of the following:

(1) To prevent the imposition of any penalty, or the addition of any amount to tax, under this part.

(2) To diminish the amount of that penalty or addition to tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1139, Sec. 159.   Effective September 25, 1987.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, by Sec. 241 of Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

24652.

(a) Section 447 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to method of accounting for corporations engaged in farming, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the amendments made by Section 13102(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 447 of
 the Internal Revenue Code, relating to method of accounting for corporations engaged in farming, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) (A) Any change in method of accounting made pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated for purposes of applying Section 24721, as initiated by the taxpayer and made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Section 13102(e)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) does not apply to this subdivision.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of this subdivision to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 29.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24652.5.

(a) (1) Section 447(i)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reduction in account if farming business contracts, shall not apply.

(2) Section 447(i)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to income inclusions, shall not apply.

(3) (A) No suspense account may be established under Section 447(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to suspense account
 for family corporations, by any corporation required by Section 447 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to method of accounting for corporations engaged in farming, to change its method of accounting for any income year ending after June 8, 1997.

(B) (i) Each suspense account under Section 447(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be reduced (but not below zero) for each income year beginning after June 8, 1997, by an amount equal to the lesser of:

(I) The applicable portion of the account.

(II) Fifty percent of the net income of the corporation for the income year, or, if the corporation has no net income for that year, the amount of any net operating loss (as defined in Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code and as modified for purposes of this part) for that income year.

For purposes of the preceding sentence, the amount of net income and net operating loss shall be determined without regard to this paragraph.

(ii) The amount of the applicable portion for any income year shall be reduced (but not below zero) by the amount of any reduction required for the income year under any other provision of Section 447(i) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(iii) Any reduction in a suspense account under this paragraph shall be included in gross income for the income year of the reduction.

(C) For purposes of subparagraph (B), the term “applicable portion” means, for any income year, the amount which would ratably reduce the amount in the account (after taking into account prior reductions) to zero over the period consisting of that income year and the remaining
 income years in those first 20 income years.

(D) Any amount in the account as of the close of that 20th year referred to in subparagraph (C) shall be treated as the applicable portion for each succeeding year thereafter to the extent not reduced under this paragraph for any prior income year after the 20th year.

(b) This section shall apply to income years ending on or after December 31, 1997.

(c) This section shall not apply to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 7) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 89.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24652.6.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, amendments made by Section 13102(e)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97), relating to preservation of suspense account rules with respect to any existing suspense accounts, shall apply to any suspense account existing as of the effective date of the act adding this subdivision that was not otherwise precluded by Section 24652.5.

(b) (1) Any change in method of accounting made pursuant to this section shall be treated for purposes of applying Section 24721, as initiated by the taxpayer and made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) Section 13102(e)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) does not apply to this section.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of this section to suspense accounts established before the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 30.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24654.

(a) Section 448 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on use of cash method of accounting, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For purposes of applying Section 448 of the Internal Revenue Code, Sections 801(d)(2), 801(d)(3), and 801(d)(5) of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-514), as modified by Section 1008(a) of
 Public Law 100-647, shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1987.

(c) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, the amendments made by Section 13102(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 448 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on use of cash method of accounting, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) (A) Any change in method of accounting made pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated for purposes of applying Section 24721, as initiated by the taxpayer and made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Section 13102(e)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) does not apply to this subdivision.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of this subdivision to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 31.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Year of Inclusion [24661. - 24679.]

24661.

Section 451 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the general rule for taxable year of inclusion, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1243, Sec. 66.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24661.3.

(a) (1) The options under Sections 112(d)(2) and 112(d)(3) of the Federal Agriculture Improvement and Reform Act of 1996 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 7212(d)(2) and (3)), as in effect on October 12, 1998, shall be disregarded in determining the taxable year for which any payment under a production flexibility contract under Subtitle B of Title I of that act (as so in effect) is properly includable in gross income for purposes of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401).

(2) In order to provide farmers with the same tax treatment for all payments in years beginning before January 1, 2002, with respect to production flexibility contract payments as provided under federal law as modified by Public Law 105-277, this subdivision shall apply to taxable years ending after December 31, 1995.

(b) Any option to accelerate the receipt of any payment under a production flexibility contract entered into on or after January 1, 2002, that is payable under the Federal Agriculture Improvement and Reform Act of 1996 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 7200 et seq.) as in effect on December 17, 1999, shall be disregarded in determining the taxable year for which that payment is properly includable in gross income for purposes of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 54.   Effective May 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24661.4.

Section 451(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to inclusion not later than for financial accounting purposes, shall not apply to specified credit card fees, as defined in Treasury Regulations Section 1.451-3(j)(2).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 110.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24661.5.

Section 451(g)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special election rule, is modified by substituting the phrase “subdivision (b) of Section 24949.1” in lieu of the phrase “section 1033(e)(2)” contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 111.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24661.6.

Section 451(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for sales or dispositions to implement Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or state electric restructuring policy, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 112.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24667.

(a) (1) Sections 453, 453A, and 453B of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to installment method, special rules for nondealers, and gain or loss on disposition of installment obligations, respectively, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) Sections 811(c)(4), 811(c)(6), and 811(c)(7) of Public Law 99-514, as modified by Section 1008(f) of Public Law 100-647, shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1988.

(3) Section 812 of Public Law 99-514, relating to the disallowance of use of the installment method for certain obligations, as modified by Section 1008(g) of Public Law 100-647, shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1988.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), any references in the Internal Revenue Code to sections that have not been incorporated into this part by reference shall be deemed to refer to the corresponding section, if any, of this part.

(c) In the case of any taxpayer who made sales under a revolving credit plan and was on the installment method under former Section 24667 or 24668 for the taxpayer’s last taxable year beginning before January 1, 1988, the provisions of this section shall be treated as a change in method of accounting for the first taxable year beginning after
 December 31, 1987, and all of the following shall apply:

(1) That change shall be treated as initiated by taxpayer.

(2) That change shall be treated as having been made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The period for taking into account adjustments under Article 6 (commencing with Section 24721) by reason of that change shall not exceed four years.

(d) The repeal of Section 453C of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 10202(a) of Public Law 100-203, relating to repeal of the proportionate disallowance of the installment method, shall apply to dispositions on or after January 1, 1990, in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(e) (1) In
 the case of any installment obligations to which Section 453(l)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code applies, in lieu of the provisions of Section 453(l)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, the “tax” (as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 23036) for any taxable year for which payment is received on that obligation shall be increased by the amount of interest determined in the manner provided under Section 453(l)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Sections 10202 and 10204 of Public Law 100-203, are modified to provide for each of the following:

(A) Section 10202 shall apply to dispositions in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(B) Section 10204 shall apply to costs incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(C) Any adjustments required by Section 481 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be included in gross income as follows:

(i) Fifty percent in the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(ii) Fifty percent in the second taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(f) (1) The amendments to Section 453A of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 2004 of Public Law 100-647, relating to special rules for nondealers, shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) In the case of any installment obligation to which Section 453A of the Internal Revenue Code applies and which is outstanding as of the close of the taxable year, in
 lieu of the provisions of Section 453A(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, the “tax” (as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 23036) for the taxable year shall be increased by the amount of interest determined in the manner provided under Section 453A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) The provisions of Section 453A(c)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the maximum rate used in calculating the deferred tax liability, are modified to refer to the maximum rate of tax imposed under Section 23151, 23186, or 23802, whichever applies, in lieu of the maximum rate of tax imposed under Section 1 or 11 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 807, Sec. 19.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24668.1.

Any taxpayer who disposes of property as a result of the exercise of the power of requisition or condemnation may, at his or her election, have the income derived from that disposition taken into account pursuant to Section 24667, if the taxpayer and the acquiring entity have, in conformity with Section 1263.015 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Section 15854.1 of the Government Code, contracted for the payment of compensation for the acquisition in a manner which satisfies the requirements of Section 24667.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1368, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

24670.

The amendments to Section 453B(e) of the Internal Revenue Code as enacted by Section 13512(b)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), relating to the repeal of the small life insurance company deduction, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 113.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24672.

(a) Where a taxpayer reports income arising from the sale or other disposition of property as provided in this article, and the entire income therefrom has not been reported prior to the year that the taxpayer ceases to be subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), the unreported income shall be included in the measure of the tax for the last year in which the taxpayer is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) or Chapter 3
 (commencing with Section 23501).

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be applicable where the installment obligation is transferred pursuant to a reorganization (as defined in Section 368(a) of the Internal Revenue Code) to another taxpayer that is a party to the reorganization (as defined in Section 368(b) of the Internal Revenue Code) subject to tax under the same chapter as the transferor, or is transferred to any exempt nonprofit cemetery corporation as defined in Section 23701c of this code.

(c) The determination of any deficiency resulting from this section shall be made under Article 3 (commencing with Section 19032) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2, but the period of limitation under that article, and the accrual of interest under Article 6 (commencing with Section 19101) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2, shall commence on the date the taxpayer ceases to be subject to the tax imposed by
 Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 952, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24673.

Where a corporation subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 2 is engaged in the performance of a contract in this State which will require more than a year to complete, the Franchise Tax Board may require that the income from the contract be reported on the basis of percentage of completion unless the corporation furnishes bond or other security guaranteeing the payment of a tax measured by the income received on the completion of the contract even though the corporation is not doing business in this State in the year subsequent to the year of completion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

24673.2.

(a) Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for long-term contracts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) Section 804(d) of Public Law 99-514, relating to the effective date of modifications in the method of accounting for long-term contracts, shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987.

(2) In the case of a contract entered into after February 28, 1986, during a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987, an adjustment to income shall be made upon completion of the contract, if necessary, to correct any underreporting or overreporting
 of income, for purposes of this part, resulting from differences between state and federal law for the taxable year in which the contract began.

(c) (1) The amendments to Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 10203 of Public Law 100-203, relating to a reduction in the percentage of items taken into account under the completed contract method, shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) In the case of a contract entered into after October 13, 1987, during a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1990, an adjustment to income shall be made upon completion of the contract, if necessary, to correct any underreporting or overreporting of income, for purposes of this part, resulting from differences between
 state and federal law for each taxable year beginning prior to January 1, 1990.

(d) (1) The amendments to Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 5041 of Public Law 100-647, relating to a reduction in the percentage of items taken into account under the completed contract method, shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) In the case of a contract entered into after June 20, 1988, during a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1990, an adjustment to income shall be made upon completion of the contract, if necessary, to correct any underreporting or overreporting of income, for purposes of this part, resulting from differences between state and federal law for each taxable year beginning prior to
 January 1, 1990.

(e) (1) The amendments to Section 460 of the Internal Revenue Code made by Section 7621 of Public Law 101-239, relating to the repeal of the completed contract method of accounting for
 long-term contracts, shall apply to each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(2) In the case of a contract entered into after July 10, 1989, during a taxable year beginning on or before January 1, 1990, an adjustment to income shall be made upon completion of the contract, if necessary, to correct any underreporting or overreporting of income, for purposes of this part, resulting from differences between state and federal law for each taxable year beginning prior to January 1, 1990.

(f) For purposes of applying paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of Section 460(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the look-back method, any adjustment to income computed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), (c), (d), or (e) shall be deemed to have been